Utah statutes.
19-5-112.   Hearings conducted by an administrative law judge -- Decisions
on denial or revocation of permit conducted by executive director.
(1) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (2), an administrative law judge
shall conduct hearings authorized by Section 19-5-111 in accordance with
Section 19-1-301.
(b)  All decisions shall be rendered by a majority of the board.
(2) (a)  An administrative law judge shall conduct, on the executive
director's behalf, a hearing regarding an appeal of a permit decision for
which the state has assumed primacy under the Federal Water Pollution Control
Act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection 19-1-301(6), the administrative law judge
shall submit to the executive director a proposed dispositive action.
(c)  The executive director may:
(i)  approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a proposed dispositive
action submitted to the executive director under Subsection (2)(b); or
(ii)  return the proposed dispositive action to the administrative law judge
for further action as directed.
(d)  The decision of the executive director is final and binding on all
parties as a final determination of the board unless stayed or overturned on
appeal.
